Idaho, session 2026, H0718.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Section 54-3312, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
54-3312. FEES. The board shall be entitled to charge and collect the
following fees subject to adjustment as prescribed by section 54-3309(c),
Idaho Code:
(a) An application fee (which shall include the cost of an examination
when required) of not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300) one thousand
dollars ($1,000);
(b) An initial license fee of not to exceed six hundred dollars ($600)
one thousand dollars ($1,000);
(c) A biennial renewal fee of not to exceed two thousand dollars
($2,000) two thousand five hundred dollars ($2,500).
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.